Missouri, session 2026, HB2849.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 177 and 307, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 177.089 and 307.377, to read as follows:
177.089. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply to the furnishing of
transportation of pupils in school districts to and from school using school buses that are
zero-emission vehicles and for the lease or rental of school buses that are zero-emission
vehicles.
2. If a continuing contract for the furnishing of transportation of pupils in school
districts is made, it shall be for a term not to exceed fifteen years. A contract is
renewable at the option of the school district and the party contracting to provide
transportation services, jointly, at the end of the term of the contract. The contract as
renewed shall include all of the terms and conditions of the previous contract, including
any provisions increasing rates based on increased costs.
3. A continuing contract may be made for the lease or rental of school buses, not
to exceed fifteen years, except that if a lease or rental contract provides that the school
district may exercise an option either to purchase the buses or to cancel the lease at the
end of each annual period during the period of the contract, the contract may be made
for a term not to exceed twenty years.
4. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a continuing contract executed
under this section may be negotiated annually within the contract period when
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2849 2
economic factors indicate negotiation is necessary to maintain an equitable pricing
structure. Renegotiation is subject to the approval of both contracting parties.
5. Any rental, lease, or lease-purchase of a school bus shall comply with the
provisions of this chapter.
307.377. 1. As used in this section, "school bus" means a commercial motor
vehicle, either publicly or privately owned, used by a school district to transport early
childhood education, elementary, or secondary school pupils from home to school, from
school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events for educational purposes. The
term "school bus" shall not include any:
(1) Bus operated by a public utility, municipal corporation, or common carrier
authorized to conduct local or interstate transportation of passengers when such bus is
not traveling a specific school bus route but is:
(a) On a regularly scheduled route for the transportation of fare-paying
passengers; or
(b) Furnishing charter service for the transportation of persons enrolled as
students on field trips or other special trips or in connection with other special events; or
(2) Passenger cars, multipurpose passenger vehicles, and trucks as defined in 49
CFR part 571, as amended.
2. Beginning January 1, 2037, one hundred percent of all newly purchased or
contracted school buses shall be zero-emission vehicles where feasible.
3. If a school district determines that the purchase or contracting of a zero-
emission school bus is not feasible due to both terrain and route constraints, the school
district may request a one-time extension for a term not to exceed five years in order to
meet the requirements of subsection 2 of this section, provided that the following
conditions are met:
(1) The school district can reasonably demonstrate that a daily planned bus
route for transporting pupils to and from school cannot be serviced through available
zero-emission technology in 2037; and
(2) The department of natural resources, in consultation with the Missouri air
conservation commission, receives and evaluates a school district's request and grants a
one-time extension based on the local school district reasonably demonstrating the
condition in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
4. Beginning January 1, 2042, if a school district with an average daily
attendance of three hundred fifty or fewer pupils determines that the purchase or
contracting of a zero-emission school bus is not feasible due to both terrain and route
constraints, such school district may request annual extensions, with the last extension

HB 2849 3
expiring on January 1, 2047, in order to meet the requirements in subsection 2 of this
section, provided that the following conditions are met:
(1) The school district can reasonably demonstrate that a daily planned bus
route for transporting pupils to and from school cannot be serviced through available
zero-emission technology in the period in which the annual waiver is sought; and
(2) The department of natural resources, in consultation with the Missouri air
conservation commission, receives and evaluates the school district's request and grants
an annual extension based on the local school district reasonably demonstrating the
condition in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
✔